Utah statutes.
57-11-13.   Enforcement powers of division -- Cease and desist orders.
(1) (a)  If the director has reason to believe that any person has been or is
engaging in conduct violating this chapter, or has violated any lawful order
or rule of the division, the director shall issue and serve upon the person a
cease and desist order and may also order the person to take such affirmative
actions the director determines will carry out the purposes of this chapter.
(b)  The person served may request an adjudicative proceeding within ten days
after receiving the order.
(c)  The cease and desist order remains in effect pending the hearing.
(d)  The division shall follow the procedures and requirements of Title 63G,
Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, if the person served requests a
hearing.
(2) (a)  After the hearing the director may issue an order making the cease
and desist order permanent if the director finds there has been a violation of
this chapter.
(b)  If no hearing is requested and the person served does not obey the
director's order, the director shall file suit in the name of the Department
of Commerce and the Division of Real Estate to enjoin the person from
violating this chapter.  The action shall be filed in the district court in
the county in which the conduct occurred or where the person resides or
carries on business.
(3)  The remedies and action provided in this section may not interfere with
or prevent the prosecution of any other remedies or actions including criminal
prosecutions.
